Alaska, session 34, HB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 28.23 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 28.23.150. Transportation network company driver fees; minimum 05 compensation. (a) A transportation network driver is entitled to payment from the 06 transportation network company of at least 90 percent of the fare charged by the 07 transportation network company to a rider for a prearranged ride. 08 (b) When a transportation network driver drives more than 10 miles from the 09 location at which the transportation network driver accepts a prearranged ride request 10 to the location at which the rider enters the driver's personal vehicle, the transportation 11 network company shall compensate the driver for the distance traveled at a rate for 12 each mile that is equal to the optional standard mileage rate for business use of 13 automobiles set by the United States Internal Revenue Service and for the time spent 14 traveling at a rate at least equal to the state minimum wage established in 15 AS 23.10.065. Additionally, the transportation network company shall, in the same 01 manner, compensate the driver for the distance traveled and the time spent traveling 02 from the location where the rider exits the driver's personal vehicle 03 (1) to the location where the driver received the ride request; or 04 (2) to the location of an accepted prearranged ride if that location is 05 more than 10 miles away. 06 (c) A transportation network company may not count a gratuity paid to a 07 transportation network company driver by a rider toward the compensation that the 08 company is required to pay the driver under (b) of this section. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.